Illinois, session 104th, SB3270.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Video Gaming Act is amended by changing 5Sections 5 and 20 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 40/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Board" means the Illinois Gaming Board.9    "Credit" means one, 5, 10, or 25 cents either won or 10purchased by a player for wagering purposes or awarded to a 11player as winnings, with such winnings payable in 12dollar-denominated credits in either cash currency, an 13electronic voucher, or a Board-authorized digital wallet.14    "Distributor" means an individual, partnership, 15corporation, or limited liability company licensed under this 16Act to buy, sell, lease, or distribute video gaming terminals 17or major components or parts of video gaming terminals to or 18from terminal operators.19    "Electronic card" means a card purchased from a licensed 20establishment, licensed fraternal establishment, licensed 21veterans establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, or 22licensed large truck stop establishment for use in that 23establishment as a substitute for cash in the conduct of   SB3270- 2 -LRB104 18649 LNS 32092 b1gaming on a video gaming terminal. 2    "Electronic voucher" means a voucher printed by an 3electronic video game machine that is redeemable in the 4licensed establishment for which it was issued. 5    "In-location bonus jackpot" means one or more video gaming 6terminals at a single licensed establishment that allows for 7wagers placed on such video gaming terminals to contribute to 8a cumulative maximum jackpot of up to $10,000. 9    "Terminal operator" means an individual, partnership, 10corporation, or limited liability company that is licensed 11under this Act and that owns, services, and maintains video 12gaming terminals for placement in licensed establishments, 13licensed truck stop establishments, licensed large truck stop 14establishments, licensed fraternal establishments, or licensed 15veterans establishments.16    "Licensed technician" means an individual who is licensed 17under this Act to repair, service, and maintain video gaming 18terminals.19    "Licensed terminal handler" means a person, including but 20not limited to an employee or independent contractor working 21for a manufacturer, distributor, supplier, technician, or 22terminal operator, who is licensed under this Act to possess 23or control a video gaming terminal or to have access to the 24inner workings of a video gaming terminal. A licensed terminal 25handler does not include an individual, partnership, 26corporation, or limited liability company defined as a   SB3270- 3 -LRB104 18649 LNS 32092 b1manufacturer, distributor, supplier, technician, or terminal 2operator under this Act. 3    "Manufacturer" means an individual, partnership, 4corporation, or limited liability company that is licensed 5under this Act and that manufactures or assembles video gaming 6terminals.7    "Supplier" means an individual, partnership, corporation, 8or limited liability company that is licensed under this Act 9to supply major components or parts to video gaming terminals 10to licensed terminal operators.11    "Net terminal income" means money put into a video gaming 12terminal minus credits paid out to players.13    "Video gaming terminal" means any electronic video game 14machine that, upon insertion of cash, electronic cards or 15vouchers, or any combination thereof, is available to play or 16simulate the play of a video game, including but not limited to 17video poker, line up, and blackjack, as authorized by the 18Board utilizing a video display and microprocessors in which 19the player may receive free games or credits that can be 20redeemed for cash. The term does not include a machine that 21directly dispenses coins, cash, or tokens or is for amusement 22purposes only.23    "Licensed establishment" means any licensed retail 24establishment where alcoholic liquor is drawn, poured, mixed, 25or otherwise served for consumption on the premises, whether 26the establishment operates on a nonprofit or for-profit basis.   SB3270- 4 -LRB104 18649 LNS 32092 b1"Licensed establishment" includes any such establishment that 2has a contractual relationship with an inter-track wagering 3location licensee licensed under the Illinois Horse Racing Act 4of 1975, provided any contractual relationship shall not 5include any transfer or offer of revenue from the operation of 6video gaming under this Act to any licensee licensed under the 7Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975. Provided, however, that the 8licensed establishment that has such a contractual 9relationship with an inter-track wagering location licensee 10may not, itself, be (i) an inter-track wagering location 11licensee, (ii) the corporate parent or subsidiary of any 12licensee licensed under the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975, 13or (iii) the corporate subsidiary of a corporation that is 14also the corporate parent or subsidiary of any licensee 15licensed under the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975. 16"Licensed establishment" does not include a facility operated 17by an organization licensee, an inter-track wagering licensee, 18or an inter-track wagering location licensee licensed under 19the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 or a riverboat licensed 20under the Illinois Gambling Act, except as provided in this 21paragraph. The changes made to this definition by Public Act 2298-587 are declarative of existing law.23    "Licensed fraternal establishment" means the location 24where a qualified fraternal organization that derives its 25charter from a national fraternal organization regularly 26meets.  SB3270- 5 -LRB104 18649 LNS 32092 b1    "Licensed veterans establishment" means the location where 2a qualified veterans organization that derives its charter 3from a national veterans organization regularly meets.4    "Licensed truck stop establishment" means a facility (i) 5that is at least a 3-acre facility with a convenience store, 6(ii) with separate diesel islands for fueling commercial motor 7vehicles, (iii) that sells at retail more than 10,000 gallons 8of diesel or biodiesel fuel per month, and (iv) with parking 9spaces for commercial motor vehicles. "Commercial motor 10vehicles" has the same meaning as defined in Section 18b-101 11of the Illinois Vehicle Code. The requirement of item (iii) of 12this paragraph may be met by showing that estimated future 13sales or past sales average at least 10,000 gallons per month. 14    "Licensed large truck stop establishment" means a facility 15located within 3 road miles from a freeway interchange, as 16measured in accordance with the Department of Transportation's 17rules regarding the criteria for the installation of business 18signs: (i) that is at least a 3-acre facility with a 19convenience store, (ii) with separate diesel islands for 20fueling commercial motor vehicles, (iii) that sells at retail 21more than 50,000 gallons of diesel or biodiesel fuel per 22month, and (iv) with parking spaces for commercial motor 23vehicles. "Commercial motor vehicles" has the same meaning as 24defined in Section 18b-101 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. The 25requirement of item (iii) of this paragraph may be met by 26showing that estimated future sales or past sales average at   SB3270- 6 -LRB104 18649 LNS 32092 b1least 50,000 gallons per month. 2    "Sales agent and broker" means an individual, partnership, 3corporation, limited liability company, or other business 4entity engaged in the solicitation or receipt of business from 5current or potential licensed establishments, licensed 6fraternal establishments, licensed veterans establishments, 7licensed truck stop establishments, or licensed large truck 8stop establishments either on an employment or contractual 9basis. 10(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 102-689, eff. 12-17-21.) 11    (230 ILCS 40/20)12    Sec. 20. Video gaming terminal payouts. 13    (a) A video gaming terminal may not directly dispense 14coins, cash, tokens, or any other article of exchange or value 15except for receipt tickets. Tickets shall be dispensed by 16pressing the ticket dispensing button on the video gaming 17terminal at the end of one's turn or play. The ticket shall 18indicate the total amount of credits and the cash award, the 19time of day in a 24-hour format showing hours and minutes, the 20date, the terminal serial number, the sequential number of the 21ticket, and an encrypted validation number from which the 22validity of the prize may be determined. Each licensed 23establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 24large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 25establishment, and licensed veterans establishment at which   SB3270- 7 -LRB104 18649 LNS 32092 b1video gaming terminals are available shall have a payout 2device approved by the Board The player shall turn in this 3ticket to the appropriate person at the licensed 4establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 5large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 6establishment, or licensed veterans establishment to receive 7the cash award. 8    (b) The cost of the credit shall be one cent, 5 cents, 10 9cents, 25 cents, or $1, and the maximum wager played per hand 10shall not exceed $4. No cash award for the maximum wager on any 11individual hand shall exceed the W-2G reporting requirements 12set by the Internal Revenue Service. Credits must be awarded 13to players as authorized by this Act $1,199. No cash award for 14the maximum wager on a jackpot, progressive or otherwise, 15shall exceed $10,000.16    (c) (Blank). In-location bonus jackpot games are hereby 17authorized. The Board shall adopt emergency rules pursuant to 18Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act to 19implement this subsection (c) within 90 days after the 20effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st General 21Assembly. Jackpot winnings from in-location progressive games 22shall be paid by the terminal operator to the player not later 23than 3 days after winning such a jackpot. 24(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.)